Hawaii, session 2025, GM1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that children are
different from adults and that these differences must be taken
into account when children are being sentenced for adult crimes.
As stated by the United States Supreme Court in Miller v.
Alabama, 567 U.S. 460 (2012), "only a relatively small
proportion of adolescents" who engage in illegal activity
"develop entrenched patterns of problem behavior", and
"developments in psychology and brain science continue to show
fundamental differences between juvenile and adult minds",
including "parts of the brain involved in behavior control".
Children are more vulnerable to negative influences and outside
pressures, including from their family and peers, and they have
limited control over their own environment and lack the ability
to extricate themselves from horrific, crime-producing settings.
The United States Supreme Court has also emphasized that "the
distinctive attributes of youth diminish the penological
justifications of imposing the harshest sentences on juvenile
2025-2704 SB544 HDl HMSO

Page 2 S.B. NO.
offenders, even when they commit terrible crimes". The
legislature further acknowledges recent research demonstrating
high rates of adverse childhood experiences and childhood trauma
among children tried as adults. Specifically, children tried as
adults have often been victims of physical, emotional, and
sexual abuse, and come from broken homes where domestic
violence, substance abuse, mental illness, and incarceration are
common.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to allow courts to
depart from mandatory minimum and sentencing enhancements when
sentencing minor defendants if the court believes the reduction
is warranted given certain factors.
SECTION 2. Chapter 706, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§706- Discretion when sentencing a defendant for an
offense committed while a minor. (1) If a person is convicted
as an adult for an offense that the person committed when the
person was a minor, in addition to any other factor that the
court is required to consider before sentencing the person, the
court shall consider the following factors:
2025-2704 SB544 HDl HMSO

Page 3 S.B. NO. 544
H.D. 1
(a) The person's exposure to an adverse childhood,
experience or early childhood trauma, including
involvement in the child welfare or foster care
systems;
(b) The person's status as a victim of human trafficking
or abuse at the time of the offense;
(c) The differences between minor and adult offenders,
including but not limited to the diminished
culpability of minors as compared to that of adults
and the typical characteristics of youth;
(d) The level of participation in the offense and the
impact of peer or familial pressure;
(e) The person's intellectual capacity and any underlying
mental health conditions; and
Any other factors the court deems relevant.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after
considering the factors set forth in subsection (1), the court
may, in its discretion, reduce any mandatory minimum period of
incarceration or depart from any mandatory sentencing
enhancement that the person is required to serve if the court
determines that the reduction or departure is warranted given
2025-2704 SB544 HDl HMSO

Page 4
S.B. NO.
the person’s age, trauma history, and prospects for
rehabilitation.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "minor" means any
person under the age of eighteen years."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2704 SB544 HDl HMSO
■■IMinilllllHHIHU

544
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
APPROVED this 29th clay ot May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 544, H.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 16, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 544, HD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 2, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives